Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 40. Virginia Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War Commission and Fund.

§§ 30-266 through 30-274.

Expired.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 40 (§§ 30-266 through 30-274), which established the Virginia Sesquicentennial of the American Civil War Commission, derived from Acts 2016, c. 465 and expired pursuant to the sunset provision in former § 30-274, effective July 1, 2017.